en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Outdoor Games: Axe Throwing; Badminton; Beer Pong; Deck Shuffleboard; Disc Golf; Lawn Games; Paddle Ball Sets; Pickleball; Platform & Paddle Tennis; Roundnet Sets; Tetherball; Zip Line Kits
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Spiele im Freien: Axtwerfen; Badminton; Beer Pong; Shuffleboard; Discgolf; Rasenspiele; Bälle für Paddle-Tennis; Pickleball; Paddletennis; Roundnet-Sets; Tetherball; Seilrutschen-Sets
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > 屋外ゲーム: アックススローイング; バドミントン; ビアポン; デッキシャッフルボード; ディスクゴルフ; バックヤードゲーム; パドルボールセット; ピックルボール用品; プラットホームテニス・パドルテニス; ラウンドネットセット; テザーボール; ジップラインキット
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Utendørsspill: Øksekasting; Badminton; Beer pong; Utendørs shuffleboard; Frisbeegolf; Hagespill; Paddleballsett; Pickleball; Platform- og paddletennis; Roundnet-sett; Smashball; Zipline-sett
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Igre na prostem: Metanje sekire; Badminton; Pivski pong; Shuffleboard za palube; Disk golf; Igre na travi; Kompleti za loparčkanje; Pickleball; Platform in paddle tenis; Roundnet kompleti; Tetherball; Kompleti za zipline
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Ulkopelit: Kirveenheitto; Sulkapallo; Beer pong; Pihacurling; Frisbeegolf; Pihapelit; Paddle Ball -setit; Pickleball; Platform-tennis ja padel; Roundnet-setit; Salkopallo; Vaijeriliukusetit
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Jeux d'extérieur: Lancer de hache; Badminton; Beer pong; Shuffeboard d'extérieur; Disque golf; Jeux de plein air; Jeux de bolo; Pickleball; Paddle-tennis; Ensembles de roundnet; Spirobole; Kits de tyrolienne
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Buitenspelen: Bijlwerpen; Badminton; Beerpong; Deckshuffleboard; Frisbeegolf; Lawn games; Peddelbalsets; Pickleball; Platform- en paddletennis; Roundnetsets; Tetherbal; Ziplinekits
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 야외 놀이: 도끼 던지기; 배드민턴; 비어 퐁; 갑판 셔플보드; 디스크 골프; 필드 게임; 패들볼 세트; 피클볼; 플랫폼/패들 테니스; 라운드넷 세트; 테더볼; 짚라인 키트
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Udendørsspil: Øksekast; Badminton; Beer pong; Shuffleboard på dæk; Discgolf; Havespil; Strandtennissæt; Pickleball; Platformtennis og paddletennis; Roundnet-sæt; Stangtennis; Svævebanesæt
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Игри на открито: Хвърляне на брадва; Бадминтон; Бирпонг; Шафълборд на открито; Диск голф; Игри на трева; Комплекти за падъл бол; Пикълбол; Тенис на платформа и падъл тенис; Комплекти за раунднет; Тетърбол; Комплекти за въжена линия
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Giochi all'aperto: Lancio dell'ascia; Badminton; Beer pong; Shuffleboard da ponte; Disc golf; Giochi da prato; Set paddleball; Pickleball; Platform tennis e paddle tennis; Set da roundnet; Tetherball; Kit per zipline
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Jocuri în aer liber: Aruncarea toporului; Badminton; Beer Pong; Shuffleboard de terasă; Discgolf; Jocuri pe iarbă; Seturi de paddle ball; Pickleball; Tenis de platformă și padel; Seturi de roundnet; Tetherball; Kituri pentru tiroliene
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Trò chơi ngoài trời: Ném rìu; Cầu lông; Chơi bóng bàn bia; Đẩy đĩa trên sàn; Disc Golf; Trò chơi trên cỏ; Bộ bóng mái chèo; Pickleball; Quần vợt platform và paddle; Bộ chơi bóng chuyền lưới tròn; Tetherball; Bộ đu dây zipline
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Lauko žaidimai: Kirvio mėtymas; Badmintonas; Alaus tenisas; Lauko slidinys; Diskgolfas; Pievos žaidimai; Padelio rinkiniai; Piklbolas; Platforminis tenisas ir padelis; „Roundnet“ žaidimo rinkiniai; Teterbolas; Trosinių nusileidimų rinkiniai
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Juegos al aire libre: Lanzamiento de hacha; Bádminton; Beer pong; Juegos de tejos; Golf con disco; Juegos sobre hierba; Juegos de pelotas de pádel; Pickleball; Pádel; Sets de roundnet; Espirobol; Kits de tirolesa
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 户外游戏: 掷斧游戏; 羽毛球; 啤酒乒乓; 甲板沙狐球; 飞盘高尔夫; 草坪游戏; 波板球套装; 匹克球; 平台网球/板网球; 圆网球套装; 绳球; 滑索套件
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Игры на открытом воздухе: Метание топоров; Бадминтон; Бирпонг; Шаффлборд на корте; Диск-гольф; Игры на лужайке; Наборы для паддлбола; Пиклбол; Теннис на платформе и паддл-теннис; Наборы для раунднета (спайкбола); Тетербол; Наборы для зиплайна
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Παιχνίδια εξωτερικού χώρου: Ρίψη τσεκουριού; Μπάντμιντον; Beer Pong; Επιτραπέζιο shuffleboard; Γκολφ με δίσκο; Παιχνίδια γρασιδιού; Σετ Paddle Ball; Pickleball; Πλατφόρμα & Paddle Tennis; Σετ roundnet; Tetherball; Κιτ για zip line
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Zahradní a venkovní hry: Vrhání seker; Badminton; Beer pong; Pozemní shuffleboard; Discgolf; Hry na trávník; Sady na paddleball; Pickleball; Pálkový tenis; Sady na roundnet; Tetherball; Sady na zipline
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > เกมกลางแจ้ง: กีฬาขว้างขวาน; แบดมินตัน; เบียร์ปอง; เกมชัฟเฟิลบอร์ด; ดิสก์กอล์ฟ; เกมบนสนามหญ้า; ชุดแพดเดิลบอล; เกมพิคเคิลบอล; แพลตฟอร์มและแพดเดิลเทนนิส; ชุดราวด์เน็ต; เทเธอร์บอล; ชุดซิปไลน์
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 戶外遊戲: 擲斧遊戲; 羽球; 投杯球; 甲板沙狐球; 飛盤高爾夫; 草地遊戲; 板球組; 匹克球; 板網球; 圓網球套組; 梨球; 滑索套組
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Açık Hava Sporları: Balta fırlatma; Badminton; Beer Pong; Deck Shuffleboard; Disc Golf; Çim Oyunları; Paddle Ball Setleri; Pickleball; Platform ve Paddle Tenis; Roundnet setleri; Tetherball; Zipline kitleri
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Szabadtéri játékok: Fejszedobás; Tollaslabda; Beer pong; Fedélzeti shuffleboard; Frizbigolf; Gyepjátékok; Paddle ball-készletek; Pickleball; Platform- és paddle tenisz; Roundnet készletek; Tetherball; Zipline készletek
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Igre na otvorenom: Bacanje sjekire; Badminton; Pivski pong; Shuffleboard; Disk golf; Igre na travnjaku; Setovi za paddleball; Piklbol; Platformski i paddle tenis; Kompleti za roundnet; Tetherball; Kompleti za zip line
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Jogos de exterior: Lançamento de machados; Badminton; Beer pong; Shuffleboard; Disc Golf; Jogos de relvado; Conjuntos de padbol; Pickleball; Padel e ténis em plataforma; Conjuntos de roundnet; Tetherball; Kits de slide
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Utomhuslek: Yxkastning; Badminton; Beer pong; Shuffleboard; Frisbeegolf; Utomhusspel; Paddelbollset; Pickleball; Platform tennis och paddle tennis; Roundnet-set; Tetherball; Zipline-kit
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Exteriérové hry: Hod sekerou; Bedminton; Pivný pong; Stolný shuffleboard; Discgolf; Hry na trávniku; Súpravy pre hru paddleball; Pickleball; Platformový a paddle tenis; Súpravy okrúhlych sietí; Tetherball; Súpravy na lanovú dráhu
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Gry na świeżym powietrzu: Rzucanie siekierą; Badminton; Beer pong; Shuffleboard; Dysk golf; Gry na trawie; Zestawy do gier z rakietkami; Pickleball; Tenis łopatkowy i platformowy; Zestawy do roundnetu; Piłka uwięziowa; Zestawy do tyrolki
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Jogos ao ar livre: Arremesso de machado; Badminton; Beer pong; Shuffleboard de navio; Golfe de discos; Jogos de gramado; Conjuntos de raquete com bola presa; Pickleball; Tênis de plataforma e padel; Conjuntos de roundnet; Espirobol; Kits de tirolesa